Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 3. General Provisions.

§ 77-3-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the following words and phrases shall include the meanings ascribed by this section unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Owner” shall specifically refer to a holder of an interest in real property which is proposed to be served by a public utility as defined in subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (d) of Section 77-3-3. “Owner” shall include both the plural and the singular and any person, firm, corporation, association or combination of such entities.

“Public utility” includes any person, firm, corporation or association and any public body, political subdivision, agency or instrumentality thereof owning or owning and operating a public utility service described by subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (d) of Section 77-3-3. However, an incorporated municipality which owns or owns and operates such a described public utility service shall not be subject to the provisions of this article. The term “public utility” also includes the successors and assigns of any such public utility.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-56; Laws, 1968, ch. 504, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 77-3-203.
Property owners’ remedies upon utility’s failure or refusal to provide service.

If any public utility, other than a municipality, shall fail or refuse to construct within its certificated area any facilities necessary to provide public utility service, or shall fail or refuse to make written commitment to do so, within a reasonable time after written request for such service by any owner of property, which request shall specify with reasonable particularity the type of service desired, such owner may, in addition to any other legal or administrative remedy provided by law and either separately or jointly with any other owner or owners in the area affected, pursue either of the following alternatives or a combination thereof:

In the name of such owner or jointly with any other person, firm or corporation, pursuant to the provisions of Section 77-3-13, apply to the Mississippi Public Service Commission for a certificate of public convenience and necessity to construct the appropriate facilities for furnishing such service or services and to furnish the same within the area affected, and, provided the commission finds that the cancellation of the outstanding certificate would be in the best interest of the consuming public as provided by Section 77-3-21, the fact that a certificate for the same type service or services may have been previously issued to the public utility failing or refusing to furnish such service shall not be prejudicial to such application; or

File with the Mississippi Public Service Commission a set of proposed plans for construction of such facilities and connection of the same with the system or systems of the utility or utilities affected, such plans to conform in all respects to all reasonable requirements of said commission and any other public body having lawful authority to establish standards of construction. The owner shall give twenty (20) days’ notice of such filing to said commission and any other public bodies aforesaid and to the public utility or utilities holding a certificate for the area affected. If, after such notice and opportunity for protest and hearing thereon, the commission shall approve such plans or any modification thereof as being supported by present or future public convenience and necessity, the owner may give notice as hereinafter provided and then proceed to let contracts for the construction of the same or to construct the same and, upon proper completion thereof and conveyance or assignment of such facilities and easements to the utility, the holder of the certificate for the area and service affected shall be obliged promptly to connect the same to its systems and provide such service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-51; Laws, 1968, ch. 504, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 77-3-205.
Determination of responsibility for costs where construction of facilities is undertaken by owner.

If such plans or any modification thereof shall be approved by the commission as provided by paragraph (b) of Section 77-3-203, the commission may enter an order either in conjunction with such approval, if notice has sufficiently dealt with the subject matter, or pursuant to special application and notice thereof to the parties, that will determine whether the right and responsibility of constructing the facilities for making such connection shall devolve on the owner or the utility and whether the whole or any part of the reasonable expense of connecting such facilities with the system or systems of the utility or utilities affected should be borne initially by such utility or utilities. If the commission should relieve any utility affected from initially undertaking the whole or any part of such connection expense, the commission may nevertheless include the portion of such expense to be initially borne by the owner in the cost of facilities for which the owner may be reimbursed as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-52; Laws, 1968, ch. 504, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 77-3-207.
Owner’s agreement with utility as to costs; contract for construction in absence of agreement.

In the event an owner is authorized to construct or cause to be constructed the whole or any part of such proposed facilities pursuant to paragraph (b) of Section 77-3-203 or pursuant to such authority and Section 77-3-205, the owner may first reach written agreement with the holder of the certificate for the area and service affected as to the reasonable cost of doing so, or for a maximum figure of reasonable cost of doing so, which reasonable cost in either event shall be subject to approval of the public service commission. If no such agreement can be reached, the owner may publish notice that bids will be received for construction of the same, which notice shall be published in the manner and for the time as required by law for publication of such notices with respect to contracts for construction by boards of supervisors of counties of this state. However, no contract shall be consummated pursuant thereto until the contract shall be approved by the commission. No such contract shall be executed unless the contractor shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond, executed by the contractor or contractors and one or more surety companies authorized to do business in this state for the faithful performance of such contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-53; Laws, 1968, ch. 504, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 77-3-209.
Allocation of costs among proposed consumer outlets; reimbursement by utility.

Upon approval by the public service commission of the reasonable cost of construction of the necessary facilities for furnishing such service and the whole or a reasonable part of the expense of connecting such facilities with the system of the utility affected, the owner may apply to said commission for an apportionment of such costs among the proposed outlets for consumer service. Any final order of allocation by the commission shall be binding upon the owner and the public utility affected. After such allocation has been made, the public utility affected shall be obliged to reimburse to the owner that portion of the reasonable cost of construction of such facilities and connection expense or the portion thereof approved by the commission, to the extent of the respective amount thereof allocated to any proposed consumer outlet, such reimbursement to be made within thirty (30) days of commencement of consumer service at such outlet.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-54; Laws, 1968, ch. 504, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 77-3-211.
Notice prior to construction; inspection during construction and upon completion; deviations.

Before construction shall be undertaken pursuant to paragraph (b) of Section 77-3-203 or Section 77-3-205, five (5) days’ written notice shall be given to the public service commission and any other public body having lawful authority over standards of such construction, the public utility affected, and each owner instituting proceedings unless notice for that period shall be waived. Each party in interest and each public body affected shall have the right of entry and inspection of such construction as it progresses and, in addition to any other remedy at law or in equity, may obtain a cease and desist order from the commission to prevent any unauthorized deviation from the plans or modifications thereof approved by said commission or from the reasonable requirements of said commission or other public body aforesaid. All parties entitled to notice shall have the right of inspection of such facilities upon completion. No public utility shall be obliged to accept any conveyance or assignment of such facilities that may be disapproved by said commission or other public body having lawful authority over standards of construction or use of the same or that may be subject to any lien or encumbrance other than the obligation of reimbursement provided for by this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-55; Laws, 1968, ch. 504, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 77-3-213.
Effect of conveyance of property after institution of proceedings on owner’s rights.

The conveyance in whole or in part of the property affected after institution of proceedings under this article shall not divest the owner, his heirs, personal representatives, successors or assigns of his, its or their rights accrued under this article unless the same be specifically conveyed or assigned by such conveyance or other written instrument.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-56; Laws, 1968, ch. 504, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 77-3-215.
Effect of transfer or assignment of public utility system.

The transfer or assignment of the whole or any part of the public utility system of any such public utility shall not defeat any prior right of service, service connection or reimbursement accrued under this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-56; Laws, 1968, ch. 504, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).

§ 77-3-217.
Provisions are cumulative and not in derogation of prior law; conduct of proceedings and appeals.

The provisions of this article shall be cumulative to, and not in derogation of, Sections 77-3-21 and 77-3-29.

Any proceedings under the provisions of this article before the public service commission shall be held and conducted as provided by Article 1 of this chapter. Appeals shall be available as a matter of right as provided by Sections 77-3-67 to 77-3-73.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-57; Laws, 1968, ch. 504, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved July 4, 1968).